District of Columbia statutes.
43-107

Officers enumerated; term of office; effect of failure to choose officers.

The officers of any such corporation shall be a president, a treasurer (who shall act as a secretary), and not less than 3 directors, who shall be severally chosen annually by ballot, and shall hold office until their successors are chosen. Any neglect to choose officers on the day fixed upon for that purpose shall not operate as a forfeiture of the act of incorporation, in accordance with the provisions of §§ 43-101 to 43-114, 43-116 to 43-118, 43-119 to 43-128.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1294, ch. 854, § 663
1981 Ed., § 27-107.
1973 Ed., § 27-107.